Utah statutes.
59-2-403.   Assessment of interstate state-assessed commercial vehicles -- Apportionment.

When assessing state-assessed commercial vehicles covering interstate routes, the commission shall apportion the assessment for the rolling stock used in interstate commerce at the same percentage ratio that has been filed with the Motor Vehicle Division of the commission for determining the proration of registration fees.

